Florida, session 2026, HB4049.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 7.01 of Article 7 of chapter 92-341,
Laws of Florida, as amended by City of Jacksonville Ordinance
No. 2014-723-E, is amended to read:
ARTICLE 7

OFFICE OF GENERAL COUNSEL
Part 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS
Section 7.01. Office established; general responsibility.
There is established an office of the City of Jacksonville
to be known as the office of general counsel, which shall have
the responsibility for furnishing legal services to the city and
its independent agencies, except that the council may create an
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4049 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4049 2026 Legislature
office of legislative counsel within the legislative branch
whose purpose shall be to advise and assist the council and its
committees and members in the achievement of a clear, faithful
and coherent expression of legislative policies and to perform
such other related duties for the council as the council may by
ordinance direct. For purposes of utilization of central
services by the city and its independent agencies, the services
of the office of general counsel shall be deemed to be central
services or services of the central service department, as the
case may be. The general counsel shall provide to any member of
the Duval County legislative delegation who resides in Duval
County upon request an opinion on any matter relative to the
government of the City of Jacksonville or any of its independent
agencies.
The General Counsel may employ, supervise and terminate
assistant counsels to assist with the efficient provision of
legal services for the City's independent agencies. The General
Counsel may authorize the independent agencies to engage outside
counsel upon certification by the General Counsel of compliance
with the Charter and with the agency's authority and a written
finding of necessity by the General Counsel. The General Counsel
may authorize the City to engage outside private counsel upon
written certification by the General Counsel of its necessity,
and such engagement shall be in accordance with procedures set
forth by the City Council.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4049 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4049 2026 Legislature
Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in the
general and permanent ordinances and charter and related laws of
the City of Jacksonville, the Duval County School Board may
employ its own general counsel, who shall be independent of the
office of general counsel of the City of Jacksonville but shall
be subject to the opinion, binding or otherwise, of the general
counsel of the City of Jacksonville in accordance with section
7.202. This provision shall apply only to the selection and
employment of a general counsel for the Duval County School
Board. All other legal services to the Duval County School Board
and the Duval County Public Schools, as determined and assigned
by the general counsel to the Duval County School Board,
including, but not limited to, representation of the Duval
County School Board and the Duval County Public Schools in
litigation and contract preparation, shall continue to be
provided through the office of general counsel of the City of
Jacksonville, and the attorneys who provide such services shall
be subject solely to the supervision of the general counsel of
the City of Jacksonville.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4049 -00-er